Washington statutes.
RCW 36.40.050

Revision by county commissioners.

The budget shall be submitted by the auditor or chief financial officer designated in a charter county to the board of county commissioners on or before the first Tuesday in September of each year. The board shall thereupon consider the same in detail, making any revisions or additions it deems advisable.

[ 2009 c 337 s 9; 1963 c 4 s 36.40.050. Prior: 1923 c 164 s 3, part; RRS s 3997-3, part.]